District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.77

Repealed

Dissolution of corporation — By written consent of shareholders.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 213, ch. 269, § 77
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(cc), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.77.
1981 Ed., § 29-377.
1973 Ed., § 29-930a.